Illinois, session 104th, HB3430.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Nonconsensual Towing Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions.As used in this Act:7    "Cargo" means goods and materials transported by a 8commercial motor vehicle as defined in 49 CFR Section 390.5, 975, including, but not limited to:10        (1) pallets;11        (2) containers;12        (3) bracing;13        (4) air pillows;14        (5) tie-down assemblies and other securement 81 15    systems;16        (6) cradles;17        (7) chocks; and18        (8) all other dunnage and packaging.19    "Commercial vehicle" means any self-propelled or motored 20device designed to be used or used primarily for the 21transportation of passengers or property, or both, and have a 22gross vehicular weight rating of fifteen thousand (15,000) 23pounds or more.  HB3430- 2 -LRB104 10396 LNS 20471 b1    "Committee" means the Commercial Vehicle Towing Advisory 2Committee created by this Act.3    "Drop fee" means a fee that a towing and recovery service 4charges to unhook a commercial motor vehicle from a tow truck.5    "Heavy-duty towing" means the towing of a vehicle, 6including trailers and semitrailers, with a gross vehicle 7rating over 26,000 pounds.8    "Law enforcement officer" means any local law enforcement 9officer or Illinois State Police trooper.10    "Medium-duty towing" means the towing of a vehicle, 11including trailers and semitrailers with a gross vehicle 12rating of over 15,000 pounds to 26,000 pounds.13    "Motor vehicle" means a vehicle which self-propels, and is 14intended primarily for use and operation on public roads and 15highways.16    "Nonconsensual towing" means the moving, transporting, or 17recovery of a commercial vehicle by a towing and recovery 18service without the prior consent or authorization of the 19owner or operator of the motor vehicle from private property 20or by police-initiated towing.21    "Per pound billing" means a method of calculating a fee 22for towing using a formula that considers the weight of the 23commercial motor vehicle, equipment, or cargo that is the 24subject of the towing and multiplies the weight of the 25vehicle, equipment, or cargo by a monetary amount.26    "Police initiated towing" means towing of a commercial   HB3430- 3 -LRB104 10396 LNS 20471 b1motor vehicle which was authorized, requested, or dispatched 2by a law enforcement officer.3    "Tow list" means a list of approved towing companies 4compiled, maintained and used by a law enforcement officer or 5his or her designee, and as authorized by the Secretary of 6State to perform police-initiated towing services of disabled 7or abandoned commercial motor vehicles.8    "Towing" means the moving, transporting, or recovery from 9public or private property, or from a storage facility of a 10person's commercial motor vehicle, the moving or removing of 11an unclaimed commercial vehicle, or the immobilization of or 12preparation for moving or removing of the commercial motor 13vehicle, for which a fee is charged either directly or 14indirectly.15    "Towing and recovery service" means an individual or 16business entity that provides towing and recovery services at 17the direction of a law enforcement officer or private property 18owner in exchange for a fee or charge.19    "Vehicle immobilization device" means a mechanical device 20that is designated or adapted to be attached to a wheel, tire, 21or other part of a parked commercial motor vehicle to prohibit 22the vehicle's usual manner of movement or operation. 23    Section 10. Commercial Vehicle Towing Advisory Committee.24    (a) The Secretary of State shall create within the 25Department of Transportation a Commercial Vehicle Towing   HB3430- 4 -LRB104 10396 LNS 20471 b1Advisory Committee. The Committee shall consist of the 2following members:3        (1) the Secretary of State, or his or her designee;4        (2) the Director of the Illinois State Police, or his 5    or her designee;6        (3) two members, the President of the Professional 7    Towing & Recovery Operators of Illinois and his or her 8    appointee, to represent the towing and recovery services 9    within the State;10        (4) two members, appointed by the President of the 11    Illinois Trucking Association, to represent the commercial 12    motor carriers within the State; and13        (5) one member, appointed by the Governor, to 14    represent the local police jurisdictions.15    (b) Members of the Committee shall serve for a term of 2 16years. Members may serve consecutive terms. Members shall 17serve without compensation.18    (c) At the first meeting, the Committee shall elect a 19chairperson from its membership to serve for a term of 2 years. 20A chairperson may serve consecutive terms.21    (d) The Committee shall hold its first meeting no later 22than September 1, 2025, at a time and location within the State 23to be determined by the Secretary of State. Thereafter, 24meetings shall be held on dates and at times and locations 25within the State and selected by the chairperson in 26consultation with the other members or by the Secretary of   HB3430- 5 -LRB104 10396 LNS 20471 b1State, if the most recent chairperson's term has expired.2    (e) The Committee shall keep and maintain a record of all 3proceedings of the Committee, and copies of all orders or 4recommendations issued by the Committee. 5    Section 15. Committee's duties. The Commercial Vehicle 6Towing Advisory Committee shall:7        (1) Establish rules and standards for the inclusion of 8    a towing and recovery service on the tow list, including 9    application procedures and minimum qualification 10    requirements.11        (2) Establish statewide maximum towing and storage 12    rates for nonconsensual tows, including those for private 13    property. The established maximum rates shall include 14    maximum rates for administrative fees, provided as 15    follows:16            (A) a towing and recovery service may charge less 17        than, but may not charge more than the approved 18        statewide rates;19            (B) the towing and recovery service shall not 20        charge or retain any fees not indicated by the 21        Committee for the maximum rates for towing and storage 22        of a commercial motor vehicle after the nonconsensual 23        tow from private property; and24            (C) the statewide maximum towing and storage rates 25        for nonconsensual tows shall be reviewed annually.   HB3430- 6 -LRB104 10396 LNS 20471 b1        Market fluctuations within the towing industry may be 2        considered along with current consensual towing market 3        rates and their relationship to nonconsensual towing 4        rates.5        (3) Require the towing and recovery service to ban the 6    use of per-pound billing for nonconsensual towing.7        (4) Publish a Towing Service Standard Manual, with 8    rules governing the use of towing and recovery services 9    for nonconsensual towing of commercial vehicles no later 10    than January 1, 2026. At a minimum, the rules shall 11    include the following provisions to:12            (A) establish the information required to be 13        included on any invoice associated with the towing of 14        a commercial motor vehicle, including, but not limited 15        to, requiring that the invoice be itemized;16            (B) establish factors that shall be considered in 17        determining whether a charge levied by a towing and 18        recovery service is fair, equitable, and reasonable;19            (C) establish a process the Committee shall use to 20        receive, investigate, and adjudicate complaints 21        against a towing and recovery service;22            (D) establish a service charge dispute resolution 23        process that includes, at a minimum, provisions 24        requiring completion of a written complaint form, 25        deadlines for initiating a complaint after receiving 26        an itemized invoice, deadlines for responding to a   HB3430- 7 -LRB104 10396 LNS 20471 b1        complaint, cessation of storage fees during the 2        complaint resolution process, a hearing on the 3        complaint, and deadlines for issuing a formal decision 4        adjudicating the service charge dispute;5            (E) establish an appeals process for the appeal of 6        any determination of order of the Committee under this 7        subsection;8            (F) establish a disciplinary procedure for 9        violations of the rules by the towing and recovery 10        service, including the suspension or removal of a 11        towing and recovery service from the tow list; and12            (G) establish a process that the Secretary of 13        State may use to suspend or remove a towing and 14        recovery service from any tow list.15        (5) Collect and compile data and information on the 16    number of people who have been towed nonconsensually and 17    the areas where nonconsensual towings have occurred. 18    Section 20. Access to towed vehicle.19    (a) Upon nonconsensual towing and recovery of a commercial 20towing vehicle and movement of the commercial motor vehicle to 21a storage facility, a towing and recovery service shall allow 22an owner of a commercial motor vehicle or a designee of the 23owner of the commercial motor vehicle to access the vehicle in 24a reasonable manner as established by rules adopted by the 25Committee. Any vehicle towed nonconsensually in this State   HB3430- 8 -LRB104 10396 LNS 20471 b1must be stored in the State.2    (b) The towing and recovery services shall provide a 3commercial vehicle owner or operator or owner's designee with 4reasonable access to the vehicle so that the vehicle owner and 5operator or the owner's designee may access and collect any 6personal property contained in the vehicle, regardless of 7whether any payment has been made for the towing and recovery 8service charges.9    (c) If there is no dispute as to the charges assessed by 10the towing and recovery service for the nonconsensual towing 11of the commercial motor vehicle, the vehicle owner or operator 12or the owner's designee shall pay the towing service invoice 13and the towing and recovery service shall release the vehicle 14immediately. 15    Section 25. Use of tow list. In authorizing a towing and 16recovery service to perform towing services, any law 17enforcement officer may use the services of a tow list, as long 18as:19        (1) they are under no obligation to include or retain 20    the services of any towing and recovery service in any 21    contract or agreement with respect to any tow list 22    established pursuant to this Act. A towing and recovery 23    service is subject to removal from a towing list at any 24    time; and25        (2) an owner or operator of a commercial motor vehicle   HB3430- 9 -LRB104 10396 LNS 20471 b1    may request a specific towing and recovery service and 2    that request shall be honored by the law enforcement 3    officer unless the requested towing and recovery service 4    cannot perform the requested towing and recovery service 5    or does not respond in a reasonable time, as determined by 6    the law enforcement officer. 7    Section 30. Prohibitions; nonconsensual tows on private 8property.9    (a) It shall be unlawful for:10        (1) a law enforcement officer to:11            (A) receive compensation or receive any other 12        incentive, monetary or otherwise, to select a 13        particular towing and recovery service from the list;14            (B) hold any financial interest in a towing and 15        recovery service; and16            (C) recommend any towing and recovery service in 17        the performance of his or her duties;18        (2) any member or employee of the Committee, 19    Department of Transportation, or Secretary of State to 20    receive compensation from a towing and recovery service 21    for the privilege of being included on the tow list;22        (3) a towing and recovery service to pay money or 23    other valuable consideration for the privilege of 24    nonconsensual towing commercial motor vehicles; and25        (4) a towing and recovery service to employ or   HB3430- 10 -LRB104 10396 LNS 20471 b1    otherwise compensate individuals, commonly referred to as 2    "spotters," whose primary task is to report the presence 3    of unauthorized, improperly, or illegally parked 4    commercial motor vehicles for the purpose of towing or 5    removal and storage.6    (b) Nonconsensual tows for unauthorized, illegally parked 7commercial motor vehicles on private property must be 8performed by State-based towers. Towed vehicles must be stored 9within the State. 10    Section 35. Documentation; authorization.11    (a) Before a towing and recovery service connects a 12commercial motor vehicle to a tow truck for a nonconsensual 13tow, the towing and recovery service shall document the 14vehicle's condition and the reason for the tow by:15        (1) taking at least 4 photographs of the vehicle, with 16    at least one photograph taken from the front, one 17    photograph taken from the rear, one photograph taken from 18    the driver's side and one taken from the passenger's side. 19    These photographs must:20            (A) show the entire vehicle from the required 21        angle; and22            (B) have the vehicle fill at least three-fourths 23        of the photograph, measured from side to side; and24        (2) taking a photograph that shows the reason the 25    vehicle is being towed nonconsensually. The photograph   HB3430- 11 -LRB104 10396 LNS 20471 b1    must show the portion of the vehicle in relation to the 2    reason, including any sign that the vehicle was towed.3    (b) Upon demand of the owner or operator of the commercial 4motor vehicle or the owner's designee, the Secretary of State 5or the Committee, the towing and recovery service shall 6provide copies of the photographs.7    (c) A towing and recovery service's failure to produce the 8photographs shall create a rebuttable presumption that the 9towing and recovery service did not have the authority to tow a 10vehicle from either a private property owner or operator or a 11law enforcement officer.12    (d) Before a towing and recovery service connects a 13commercial motor vehicle to a tow truck for a nonconsensual 14tow, the towing and recovery service shall have authorization 15to nonconsensually tow a commercial motor vehicle. 16Authorization shall be found if:17        (1) a law enforcement officer requests a 18    police-initiated tow and requests that a towing and 19    recovery service from the tow list provide towing;20        (2) the towing and recovery service has received 21    permission to tow the commercial motor vehicle from the 22    owner of the private property;23        (3) a towing service shall not tow a commercial motor 24    vehicle from private property without the owner or 25    operator of the private property giving the tower service 26    written permission; or  HB3430- 12 -LRB104 10396 LNS 20471 b1        (4) in order for the towing and recovery service to 2    conduct a nonconsensual tow, the private property owner 3    must have posted signage visible and facing the driver at 4    each entryway into the property stating that vehicles 5    parked on the property without authorization or 6    inappropriately or illegally parked are subject to being 7    towed. The sign must also contain the international towing 8    symbol no smaller than 4 inches by 4 inches and be 9    permanently mounted in a position that is no lower than 5 10    feet and no higher than 8 feet.11    (e) The towing and recovery service shall not assess a 12drop fee to release the commercial motor vehicle after the 13vehicle is hooked up to the tow truck but before the vehicle is 14removed from the private property. 15    Section 40. Vehicle immobilization devices prohibited. A 16towing and recovery service shall not use vehicle 17immobilization devices except under the direction of law 18enforcement. 19    Section 90. Repeal. This Act is repealed on July 1, 2030. 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 212025.